District of Columbia statutes.
29-107.05

Savings clause.

The repeal of a law by this title shall not affect:

(1)

The operation of the law or any action taken under it before its repeal;

(2)

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation, or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

(3)

Any violation of the law or any penalty, forfeiture, or punishment incurred because of the violation before its repeal; or

(4)

Any proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution commenced under the law before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720